SpellChecker/bash.aff
FLAG long
SFX O81 Y 332 # N07 Der/дағы+
SFX O81 0 ҙар .	+Pl
SFX O81 0 ҙармы .	+Pl+Q
SFX O81 0 ҙарҙыр .	+Pl+Indf
SFX O81 0 ҙарсы .	+Pl+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 ҙоң .	+Gen
SFX O81 0 ға .	+Dat
SFX O81 0 ҙо .	+Acc
SFX O81 0 ҙан .	+Abl
SFX O81 0 ҙа .	+Loc
SFX O81 0 ҙоңмо .	+Gen+Q
SFX O81 0 ғамы .	+Dat+Q
SFX O81 0 ҙомо .	+Acc+Q
SFX O81 0 ҙанмы .	+Abl+Q
SFX O81 0 ҙамы .	+Loc+Q
SFX O81 0 ҙоңдор .	+Gen+Indf
SFX O81 0 ғалыр .	+Dat+Indf
SFX O81 0 ҙолор .	+Acc+Indf
SFX O81 0 ҙандыр .	+Abl+Indf
SFX O81 0 ҙалыр .	+Loc+Indf
SFX O81 0 ҙоңсо .	+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 ғасы .	+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 ҙосо .	+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 ҙансы .	+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 ҙасы .	+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 ом .	+PxSg1
SFX O81 0 оң .	+PxSg2
SFX O81 0 о .	+PxSg3
SFX O81 0 обоҙ .	+PxPl1
SFX O81 0 оғоҙ .	+PxPl2
SFX O81 0 омдоң .	+PxSg1+Gen
SFX O81 0 оңдоң .	+PxSg2+Gen
SFX O81 0 оноң .	+PxSg3+Gen
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙоң .	+PxPl1+Gen
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙоң .	+PxPl2+Gen
SFX O81 0 ома .	+PxSg1+Dat
SFX O81 0 оңа .	+PxSg2+Dat
SFX O81 0 она .	+PxSg3+Dat
SFX O81 0 обоҙға .	+PxPl1+Dat
SFX O81 0 оғоҙға .	+PxPl2+Dat
SFX O81 0 омдо .	+PxSg1+Acc
SFX O81 0 оңдо .	+PxSg2+Acc
SFX O81 0 он .	+PxSg3+Acc
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙо .	+PxPl1+Acc
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙо .	+PxPl2+Acc
SFX O81 0 омдан .	+PxSg1+Abl
SFX O81 0 оңдан .	+PxSg2+Abl
SFX O81 0 онан .	+PxSg3+Abl
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙан .	+PxPl1+Abl
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙан .	+PxPl2+Abl
SFX O81 0 омда .	+PxSg1+Loc
SFX O81 0 оңда .	+PxSg2+Loc
SFX O81 0 онда .	+PxSg3+Loc
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙа .	+PxPl1+Loc
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙа .	+PxPl2+Loc
SFX O81 0 омдоңмо .	+PxSg1+Gen+Q
SFX O81 0 оңдоңмо .	+PxSg2+Gen+Q
SFX O81 0 оноңмо .	+PxSg3+Gen+Q
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙоңмо .	+PxPl1+Gen+Q
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙоңмо .	+PxPl2+Gen+Q
SFX O81 0 омамы .	+PxSg1+Dat+Q
SFX O81 0 оңамы .	+PxSg2+Dat+Q
SFX O81 0 онамы .	+PxSg3+Dat+Q
SFX O81 0 обоҙғамы .	+PxPl1+Dat+Q
SFX O81 0 оғоҙғамы .	+PxPl2+Dat+Q
SFX O81 0 омдомо .	+PxSg1+Acc+Q
SFX O81 0 оңдомо .	+PxSg2+Acc+Q
SFX O81 0 онмо .	+PxSg3+Acc+Q
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙомо .	+PxPl1+Acc+Q
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙомо .	+PxPl2+Acc+Q
SFX O81 0 омданмы .	+PxSg1+Abl+Q
SFX O81 0 оңданмы .	+PxSg2+Abl+Q
SFX O81 0 онанмы .	+PxSg3+Abl+Q
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙанмы .	+PxPl1+Abl+Q
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙанмы .	+PxPl2+Abl+Q
SFX O81 0 омдамы .	+PxSg1+Loc+Q
SFX O81 0 оңдамы .	+PxSg2+Loc+Q
SFX O81 0 ондамы .	+PxSg3+Loc+Q
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙамы .	+PxPl1+Loc+Q
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙамы .	+PxPl2+Loc+Q
SFX O81 0 омдоңмолор .	+PxSg1+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 оңдоңмолор .	+PxSg2+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 оноңмолор .	+PxSg3+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙоңмолор .	+PxPl1+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙоңмолор .	+PxPl2+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 омамылыр .	+PxSg1+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 оңамылыр .	+PxSg2+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 онамылыр .	+PxSg3+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 обоҙғамылыр .	+PxPl1+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 оғоҙғамылыр .	+PxPl2+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 омдомолор .	+PxSg1+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 оңдомолор .	+PxSg2+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 онмолор .	+PxSg3+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙомолор .	+PxPl1+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙомолор .	+PxPl2+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 омданмылыр .	+PxSg1+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 оңданмылыр .	+PxSg2+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 онанмылыр .	+PxSg3+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙанмылыр .	+PxPl1+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙанмылыр .	+PxPl2+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 омдамылыр .	+PxSg1+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 оңдамылыр .	+PxSg2+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 ондамылыр .	+PxSg3+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙамылыр .	+PxPl1+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙамылыр .	+PxPl2+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 омдоңдор .	+PxSg1+Gen+Indf
SFX O81 0 оңдоңдор .	+PxSg2+Gen+Indf
SFX O81 0 оноңдор .	+PxSg3+Gen+Indf
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙоңдор .	+PxPl1+Gen+Indf
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙоңдор .	+PxPl2+Gen+Indf
SFX O81 0 омалыр .	+PxSg1+Dat+Indf
SFX O81 0 оңалыр .	+PxSg2+Dat+Indf
SFX O81 0 оналыр .	+PxSg3+Dat+Indf
SFX O81 0 обоҙғалыр .	+PxPl1+Dat+Indf
SFX O81 0 оғоҙғалыр .	+PxPl2+Dat+Indf
SFX O81 0 омдолор .	+PxSg1+Acc+Indf
SFX O81 0 оңдолор .	+PxSg2+Acc+Indf
SFX O81 0 ондор .	+PxSg3+Acc+Indf
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙолор .	+PxPl1+Acc+Indf
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙолор .	+PxPl2+Acc+Indf
SFX O81 0 омдандыр .	+PxSg1+Abl+Indf
SFX O81 0 оңдандыр .	+PxSg2+Abl+Indf
SFX O81 0 онандыр .	+PxSg3+Abl+Indf
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙандыр .	+PxPl1+Abl+Indf
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙандыр .	+PxPl2+Abl+Indf
SFX O81 0 омдалыр .	+PxSg1+Loc+Indf
SFX O81 0 оңдалыр .	+PxSg2+Loc+Indf
SFX O81 0 ондалыр .	+PxSg3+Loc+Indf
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙалыр .	+PxPl1+Loc+Indf
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙалыр .	+PxPl2+Loc+Indf
SFX O81 0 омдоңсо .	+PxSg1+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оңдоңсо .	+PxSg2+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оноңсо .	+PxSg3+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙоңсо .	+PxPl1+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙоңсо .	+PxPl2+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 омасы .	+PxSg1+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оңасы .	+PxSg2+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 онасы .	+PxSg3+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 обоҙғасы .	+PxPl1+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оғоҙғасы .	+PxPl2+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 омдосо .	+PxSg1+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оңдосо .	+PxSg2+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 онсо .	+PxSg3+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙосо .	+PxPl1+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙосо .	+PxPl2+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 омдансы .	+PxSg1+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оңдансы .	+PxSg2+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 онансы .	+PxSg3+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙансы .	+PxPl1+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙансы .	+PxPl2+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 омдасы .	+PxSg1+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оңдасы .	+PxSg2+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 ондасы .	+PxSg3+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙасы .	+PxPl1+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙасы .	+PxPl2+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оммо .	+PxSg1+Q
SFX O81 0 оңмо .	+PxSg2+Q
SFX O81 0 омо .	+PxSg3+Q
SFX O81 0 обоҙмо .	+PxPl1+Q
SFX O81 0 оғоҙмо .	+PxPl2+Q
SFX O81 0 оммолор .	+PxSg1+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 оңмолор .	+PxSg2+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 омолор .	+PxSg3+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 обоҙмолор .	+PxPl1+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 оғоҙмолор .	+PxPl2+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 омдор .	+PxSg1+Indf
SFX O81 0 оңдор .	+PxSg2+Indf
SFX O81 0 олор .	+PxSg3+Indf
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙор .	+PxPl1+Indf
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙор .	+PxPl2+Indf
SFX O81 0 омсо .	+PxSg1+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оңсо .	+PxSg2+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 осо .	+PxSg3+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 обоҙсо .	+PxPl1+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оғоҙсо .	+PxPl2+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 омдоҡо .	+PxSg1+Poss
SFX O81 0 оңдоҡо .	+PxSg2+Poss
SFX O81 0 оноҡо .	+PxSg3+Poss
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙоҡо .	+PxPl1+Poss
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙоҡо .	+PxPl2+Poss
SFX O81 0 омдоҡоноң .	+PxSg1+Poss+Gen
SFX O81 0 оңдоҡоноң .	+PxSg2+Poss+Gen
SFX O81 0 оноҡоноң .	+PxSg3+Poss+Gen
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙоҡоноң .	+PxPl1+Poss+Gen
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙоҡоноң .	+PxPl2+Poss+Gen
SFX O81 0 омдоҡона .	+PxSg1+Poss+Dat
SFX O81 0 оңдоҡона .	+PxSg2+Poss+Dat
SFX O81 0 оноҡона .	+PxSg3+Poss+Dat
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙоҡона .	+PxPl1+Poss+Dat
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙоҡона .	+PxPl2+Poss+Dat
SFX O81 0 омдоҡон .	+PxSg1+Poss+Acc
SFX O81 0 оңдоҡон .	+PxSg2+Poss+Acc
SFX O81 0 оноҡон .	+PxSg3+Poss+Acc
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙоҡон .	+PxPl1+Poss+Acc
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙоҡон .	+PxPl2+Poss+Acc
SFX O81 0 омдоҡонан .	+PxSg1+Poss+Acc
SFX O81 0 оңдоҡонан .	+PxSg2+Poss+Acc
SFX O81 0 оноҡонан .	+PxSg3+Poss+Acc
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙоҡонан .	+PxPl1+Poss+Acc
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙоҡонан .	+PxPl2+Poss+Acc
SFX O81 0 омдоҡонда .	+PxSg1+Poss+Loc
SFX O81 0 оңдоҡонда .	+PxSg2+Poss+Loc
SFX O81 0 оноҡонда .	+PxSg3+Poss+Loc
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙоҡонда .	+PxPl1+Poss+Loc
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙоҡонда .	+PxPl2+Poss+Loc
SFX O81 0 омдоҡоноңмо .	+PxSg1+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX O81 0 оңдоҡоноңмо .	+PxSg2+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX O81 0 оноҡоноңмо .	+PxSg3+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙоҡоноңмо .	+PxPl1+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙоҡоноңмо .	+PxPl2+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX O81 0 омдоҡонамы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX O81 0 оңдоҡонамы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX O81 0 оноҡонамы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙоҡонамы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙоҡонамы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX O81 0 омдоҡонмо .	+PxSg1+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX O81 0 оңдоҡонмо .	+PxSg2+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX O81 0 оноҡонмо .	+PxSg3+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙоҡонмо .	+PxPl1+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙоҡонмо .	+PxPl2+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX O81 0 омдоҡонанмы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX O81 0 оңдоҡонанмы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX O81 0 оноҡонанмы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙоҡонанмы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙоҡонанмы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX O81 0 омдоҡондамы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX O81 0 оңдоҡондамы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX O81 0 оноҡондамы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙоҡондамы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙоҡондамы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX O81 0 омдоҡоноңдор .	+PxSg1+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX O81 0 оңдоҡоноңдор .	+PxSg2+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX O81 0 оноҡоноңдор .	+PxSg3+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙоҡоноңдор .	+PxPl1+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙоҡоноңдор .	+PxPl2+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX O81 0 омдоҡоналыр .	+PxSg1+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX O81 0 оңдоҡоналыр .	+PxSg2+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX O81 0 оноҡоналыр .	+PxSg3+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙоҡоналыр .	+PxPl1+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙоҡоналыр .	+PxPl2+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX O81 0 омдоҡондор .	+PxSg1+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX O81 0 оңдоҡондор .	+PxSg2+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX O81 0 оноҡондор .	+PxSg3+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙоҡондор .	+PxPl1+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙоҡондор .	+PxPl2+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX O81 0 омдоҡонандыр .	+PxSg1+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX O81 0 оңдоҡонандыр .	+PxSg2+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX O81 0 оноҡонандыр .	+PxSg3+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙоҡонандыр .	+PxPl1+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙоҡонандыр .	+PxPl2+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX O81 0 омдоҡондалыр .	+PxSg1+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX O81 0 оңдоҡондалыр .	+PxSg2+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX O81 0 оноҡондалыр .	+PxSg3+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙоҡондалыр .	+PxPl1+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙоҡондалыр .	+PxPl2+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX O81 0 омдоҡоноңсо .	+PxSg1+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оңдоҡоноңсо .	+PxSg2+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оноҡоноңсо .	+PxSg3+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙоҡоноңсо .	+PxPl1+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙоҡоноңсо .	+PxPl2+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 омдоҡонасы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оңдоҡонасы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оноҡонасы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙоҡонасы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙоҡонасы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 омдоҡонсо .	+PxSg1+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оңдоҡонсо .	+PxSg2+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оноҡонсо .	+PxSg3+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙоҡонсо .	+PxPl1+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙоҡонсо .	+PxPl2+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 омдоҡонансы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оңдоҡонансы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оноҡонансы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙоҡонансы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙоҡонансы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 омдоҡондасы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оңдоҡондасы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оноҡондасы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙоҡондасы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙоҡондасы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 омдоҡомо .	+PxSg1+Poss +Q
SFX O81 0 оңдоҡомо .	+PxSg2+Poss +Q
SFX O81 0 оноҡомо .	+PxSg3+Poss +Q
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙоҡомо .	+PxPl1+Poss +Q
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙоҡомо .	+PxPl2+Poss +Q
SFX O81 0 омдоҡолор .	+PxSg1+Poss +Indf
SFX O81 0 оңдоҡолор .	+PxSg2+Poss +Indf
SFX O81 0 оноҡолор .	+PxSg3+Poss +Indf
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙоҡолор .	+PxPl1+Poss +Indf
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙоҡолор .	+PxPl2+Poss +Indf
SFX O81 0 омдоҡосо .	+PxSg1+Poss +Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оңдоҡосо .	+PxSg2+Poss +Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оноҡосо .	+PxSg3+Poss +Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 обоҙҙоҡосо .	+PxPl1+Poss +Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 оғоҙҙоҡосо .	+PxPl2+Poss +Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 мо .	+Q
SFX O81 0 молор .	+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 ҙор .	+Indf
SFX O81 0 со .	+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 ҙоҡо .	+Poss
SFX O81 0 ҙоҡоноң .	+Poss+Gen
SFX O81 0 ҙоҡона .	+Poss+Dat
SFX O81 0 ҙоҡон .	+Poss+Acc
SFX O81 0 ҙоҡонан .	+Poss+Abl
SFX O81 0 ҙоҡонда .	+Poss+Loc
SFX O81 0 ҙоҡоноңмо .	+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX O81 0 ҙоҡонамы .	+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX O81 0 ҙоҡонмо .	+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX O81 0 ҙоҡонанмы .	+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX O81 0 ҙоҡондамы .	+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX O81 0 ҙоҡоноңдор .	+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX O81 0 ҙоҡоналыр .	+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX O81 0 ҙоҡондор .	+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX O81 0 ҙоҡонандыр .	+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX O81 0 ҙоҡондалыр .	+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX O81 0 ҙоҡоноңсо .	+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 ҙоҡонасы .	+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 ҙоҡонсо .	+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 ҙоҡонансы .	+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 ҙоҡондасы .	+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 ҙоҡомо .	+Poss+Q
SFX O81 0 ҙоҡолор .	+Poss+Indf
SFX O81 0 ҙоҡосо .	+Poss+Clt/сы
SFX O81 0 ҙай .	+Der/дай
SFX O81 0 са .	+Der/са
SFX O81 0 ҙаймы .	+Der/дай+Q
SFX O81 0 самы .	+Der/са+Q
SFX O81 0 ҙаймылыр .	+Der/дай+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 самылыр .	+Der/са+Q+Indf
SFX O81 0 ҙайҙыр .	+Der/дай+Indf
